test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_NoExtra_apanjigan_gt-norm.yaml
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhimishinaanibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhimishinaanibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhimishinaanibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhimishiwaaibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhimishiwaaibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhimishiwaaibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: apanjiganenhimishiniibanan
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: apanjiganenhimishiniibanag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: apanjiganenhimishiniibaning
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: apanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: apanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: apanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganensimishiniibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganensimishiniibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganensimishiniibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niapanjiganenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niapanjiganenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niapanjiganenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganensimishiniibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganensimishiniibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganensimishiniibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giapanjiganenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giapanjiganenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giapanjiganenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganensimishiniibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganensimishiniibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganensimishiniibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oapanjiganenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oapanjiganenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oapanjiganenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3apanjigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oapanjiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
